Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 3. Drive-In Areas

§ 12-5-301.
Conditions for operation.

Upon approval of the licensing authority, a drive-in area adjacent or contiguous to the licensed building may be used by the holder of a retail liquor license for taking orders, making delivery of and receiving payment for alcoholic liquor or malt beverages under the following conditions:

The holder of the retail liquor license shall own the area or hold a written lease for the period for which the license was issued;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 63, § 2.

The area shall be well lighted and subject to inspection by the licensing authority at any and all times;

No walls or screens shall interfere with observing and checking the part of the area used for orders, delivery and payment;

No order shall be received from nor delivery made to a person under twenty-one (21) years of age or an intoxicated person in the area;

No part of a publicly owned sidewalk, highway, street or alley shall be used for taking orders or conducting sales; and

Alcoholic liquor or malt beverages shall be sold and delivered in the drive-in area only in the original, unopened package and consumption of alcoholic liquor or malt beverages in the drive-in area shall not be permitted.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-18.4; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-119; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1988, ch. 44, § 1; 2017 ch. 63, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 63, §
1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “building” for “room.”

The second 2017 amendment ,by ch. 63, §
2, effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “No part of the area used for orders, delivery and making payment shall be more than forty (40) feet distant from the licensed room.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Paragraph (a)(v) establishes a duty toward the general public;

it is not meant only to protect minors. McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983), limited, Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

Violation of paragraph (a)(v) is evidence of negligence

and may be considered by the trier of fact together with other circumstances in determining the issue of negligence. McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983), limited, Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

White v. Ha, Inc., 782 P.2d 1125,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 225

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Torts — Injuries Arising From Negligence in Furnishing Liquor to Minors and Intoxicated Adults: New Tort Action in Wyoming. McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 285 (1984).

§ 12-5-302.
Determination to forbid or restrict.

The agents and officers of the licensing authority administering the retail liquor license shall determine whether traffic conditions or physical circumstances hindering law enforcement should require a decision forbidding or restricting sales and delivery in any drive-in area. If by resolution of the licensing authority the right of a licensee to use certain drive-in areas is forbidden or restricted that resolution shall be complied with by the licensee.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 49, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 12-18.5; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-120; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1.